Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. Public Information About Programs.

Sec. 47.18.050.
Public awareness campaign.

The department shall develop and implement statewide a continuing public awareness campaign, including appropriate public forums and workshops, radio and television public service announcements, and press releases designed to

communicate to the public the scope and magnitude of the adolescent pregnancy and parenthood problem in the state;

encourage community activities that will educate adults and adolescents about the importance of reducing adolescent pregnancy;

enlist the active support and involvement of members of the public and community organizations in the development and implementation of community-based programs and activities to reduce adolescent pregnancy and assist adolescent parents in obtaining needed educational, vocational, and parenting skills.

A primary policy and objective of the public awareness campaign required under (a) of this section shall be to encourage adolescents to abstain from premarital sexual intimacy.

History.

(§ 1 ch 94 SLA 1991)